Massachusetts, session 194th, S3089.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The Hyannis Transportation Center in the town of Hyannis, shall be designated and 
known as the Thomas S. Cahir Cape Cod Transportation Center in honor of former State 
Representative and former Administrator of the Cape Cod Regional Transit Authority, Thomas 
S. Cahir. The Cape Cod Regional Transit Authority shall erect and maintain suitable signage 
bearing that designation in compliance with the standards of the authority.